Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.140

Columbia Basin project road systems—Establishment by plat.

When plats or blocks of farm units have been or are filed under the provisions of chapter 89.12 RCW which contain a system of county roads, or when a supplemental plat of a system of county roads to serve such a plat is filed in connection therewith, the filing period and formal approval by the board of county commissioners shall constitute establishment as county roads: PROVIDED, That the board of county commissioners have obtained the individual rights-of-way by deed or as otherwise provided by law.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.140. Prior: 1953 c 199 s 1.]